California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(5) There has been an alarming increase in extremely vulnerable children. Ten to 15 percent of infants born in public hospitals in large cities are drug-or alcohol-addicted. These children require intensive services and are overwhelming California’s foster care capacity.

(6) There have been major changes from the past in female and teenage work behavior. The high percentage (54 percent) of children with both parents working means that the quality of child care is very important. By the year 2000, 60 percent of parents will work full time. Publicly supported child care, however, covers only 8 percent of the eligible low-income population. The growth in the number of teenagers working (about 45 percent work 16 hours or more a week) leaves less time for leisure activities or homework.

(b) There is no adequate comprehensive system for the delivery of services to children and youth; instead, services to children are provided by various departments and agencies at both the state and county levels, often without appropriate collaboration, resulting in gaps in services and program duplication.

(c) Too often, resources are not available to provide preventive services to children and families which would alleviate the need for a more costly response to a later crisis. The current service delivery system promotes intervention at the latest, most costly, and least effective point. A greater focus on prevention rather than intervention maximizes the expenditure of state funds and results in the provision of more effective services to children.

(d) The facts and trends cited in this section require the state’s major policies and institutions to engage in planning and coordinating services to meet the needs of the state’s growing and changing population of children and to develop alternative ways of organizing and allocating resources for services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1303, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18986.2.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this chapter, to encourage the development of a comprehensive and collaborative delivery system of services to children and youths at the state and local level and to offer fiscal incentives in the form of waivers and negotiated contracts to encourage collaboration. The goal of that collaborative system shall be to:

(a) Develop a service delivery plan which emphasizes preventive and early intervention services that maximize the healthy development of children and minimize the long-term need for public resources. 

(b) Allow for flexibility of expenditures in public funds. 

(c) Emphasize local decisionmaking and provide for greater flexibility to local government in designing delivery systems. 

(d) Provide for a continuum of family-centered, child-focused services through public/private partnerships within the community. 

(e) Minimize duplicate administrative systems. 

(f) Identify gaps in services to target populations. 

(g) Provide case management services to children and families with multiple needs. 

(h) Involve school districts in the planning and delivery of coordinated services for children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 994, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18986.3.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Children’s services” means any services provided by any state or local agency or private entity for the health, safety, or well-being of minors.

(b) “Council” means an interagency children’s services coordinating council established pursuant to Section 18986.10.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 347, Sec. 48.   (SB 942)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. County Interagency Collaboration [18986.10. - 18986.15.]

18986.10.

The board of supervisors of any county or city and county may establish an interagency children’s services coordination council.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1303, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18986.11.

A council shall be comprised of, but not be limited to, the following members:

(a) Persons responsible for management of the following county functions:

(1) Alcohol and drug programs.

(2) Children’s services.

(3) Housing and redevelopment.

(4) Mental health services.

(5) Probation.

(6) Public health services.

(7) Welfare or public social services.

(b) The presiding judge of the county’s juvenile court.

(c) The superintendent of the county office of education and at least one superintendent of a unified school district within the county.

(d) A prosecuting attorney of the county or city and county.

(e) A representative of a private nonprofit corporation which has a goal of entering into a public private partnership with the county to meet the needs of children that are not adequately met by existing public or private funds.

(f) One member of the county board of supervisors.

(g) A representative of law enforcement.

(h) A representative of the local child abuse council.

(i) A representative of a local planning agency participating in the California Early Intervention Program pursuant to Subchapter VIII (commencing with Section 1471) of Chapter 33 of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(j) A representative of the local child care resource and referral agency or other local child care coordinating group.

(k) A representative, or representatives, of one or more community-based organizations with ties to the ethnic communities served in the area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 552, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

18986.12.

(a) The council shall convene monthly and shall, in addition, convene at least two public meetings annually inviting public testimony.

(b) Meetings of the council shall be convened by an executive director who is appointed by the county board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1303, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18986.13.

The county board of supervisors may designate an existing, duly established interagency children’s services coordinating body as the county’s interagency children’s services coordination council as authorized by Section 18986.10. However, the membership, responsibilities, and duties of that existing body shall be modified by the board as necessary to conform to the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1303, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18986.14.

The council’s duties shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Ensuring collaboration and countywide planning for the provision of children’s services.

(b) Identifying those agencies that have a significant joint responsibility in providing services to children and families.

(c) Identifying gaps in services to specific populations.

(d) Developing policies and setting priorities to ensure service effectiveness.

(e) Implementing public and private collaborative programs whenever possible. 

(f) Providing for countywide interagency case management to coordinate resources, especially for those children and their families who are using the services of more than one agency concurrently.

(g) Identify, coordinate with, and, where feasible, integrate with existing children’s services groups and other coordinating bodies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1303, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18986.15.

Each county wishing to participate under this chapter shall develop a three-year program for phasing in a coordinated children’s services system.

(a) A plan for coordinated children’s services may include proposals to combine and coordinate services to one or more of the following special populations of children provided by two or more existing local service agencies: 

(1) Abused or neglected children and those at risk of abuse or neglect. 

(2) Children in foster care or at risk of entering foster care. 

(3) Children requiring mental health services. 

(4) Children needing health care services delivered by local maternal and child health services, including, but not limited to, services provided under the California Children’s Services Program, the Child Health and Disability Prevention Program, and perinatal services. 

(5) Delinquent, status offender, and homeless minors. 

(6) Minors in need of job training and placement services.

(7) School dropouts, or those at risk of dropping out. 

(8) Infants born with identified drug dependencies and children with known histories of substance abuse. 

(9) Children with developmental disabilities. 

(10) Children in need of preschool or child care services. 

(b) Plans shall include all of the following: 

(1) Use of existing service capabilities within the various agencies currently serving children’s needs in the county. 

(2) Interagency collaboration and program consolidation among publicly and privately funded agencies providing services to children. 

(3) Appropriate interagency protocols and agreements. 

(4) Services for the most vulnerable or at-risk children. 

(5) Services which permit children to reside in their usual family setting whenever possible and in their best interest. 

(6) Components designed to promote an effective case management system. 

(7) Estimates of cost benefits and cost avoidance of the program proposal. 

(8) A specific list of the benefits to children under the plan, including objective measures of successful outcome and program effectiveness. 

(c) No later than July 1 of each year, any county that wishes to participate pursuant to this chapter shall submit to the county board of supervisors a program proposal for the development of a coordinated system of children’s services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 994, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Waivers [18986.20. - 18986.24.]

18986.20.

(a) Any county that wishes to participate under this chapter and that develops a three-year program of coordinated children’s services pursuant to Section 18986.15, may, as a part of its plan, request a waiver of existing state regulations pertaining to requirements which hinder coordination of children’s services. The county may also request authorization to enter into a negotiated contract which enables the repositioning and reallocation of existing resources to facilitate integrated case management and coordination among participating agencies.

(b) Requests for waivers or negotiated contracts shall be submitted in writing, with a detailed description of the county’s plan for
 coordinated children’s services and a detailed description of the need for the waiver or negotiated contract to the Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Attorney General, and the Secretary of the Youth and Adult Correctional Agency. Requests for negotiated contracts shall also be submitted to the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 347, Sec. 49.   (SB 942)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18986.21.

(a) A waiver or waivers may be granted pursuant to this chapter when existing regulations hinder the coordination of children’s services and when waivers would facilitate the implementation of this chapter. 

(b) Any request for a waiver under this chapter shall contain, at a minimum, all of the following: 

(1) The regulation or regulations for which the county requests a waiver. 

(2) A statement regarding why the identified regulation or regulations should be waived. 

(3) A statement regarding why the identified regulation or regulations inhibit the efficient administration of the program. 

(4) A comparison of the following: 

(A) The services and the number of persons to be served under the requested waiver. 

(B) The services and the number of persons to be served without the requested waiver. 

(5) Projected costs or savings due to the requested waiver. 

(6) Any impact on state and federal funding. 

(c) When approving a county request for a waiver pursuant to this chapter, the entity granting the waiver shall ensure all of the following: 

(1) Services and eligible persons served under the affected program are maintained. 

(2) There is no increase in costs to the state or to clients. 

(3) There is no loss of federal financial participation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

18986.22.

(a) A negotiated contract may be awarded pursuant to this chapter when existing regulations and categorical programs hinder the coordination of children’s services and prohibit integrated case management. 

(b) A negotiated contract means an agreement entered into between the state and the county pursuant to Section 18986.23 which authorizes the reallocation of existing resources from participating agencies for purposes specified in each contract. 

(c) Each negotiated contract shall specify all of the following: 

(1) The target population to be served. 

(2) The core services to be offered. 

(3) The net amount of resources to be reallocated and pooled. 

(4) Intake and eligibility criteria. 

(5) Provisions for sharing data between agencies while maintaining client confidentiality. 

(6) Evaluation measures, including specific outcomes and performance criteria to be achieved as a condition of the negotiated contract and appropriate sanctions if evaluation measures are not met. 

(7) The duration of the contract period, including provisions for contract renewal. 

(8) any other provisions which are deemed necessary to ensure program and fiscal accountability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 994, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

18986.23.

Waivers and negotiated contracts shall be granted pursuant to this chapter by the Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Attorney General, or the Secretary of the Youth and Adult Correctional Agency, in consultation with the Department of Finance as follows:

(a) The Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency shall grant waivers or negotiated contracts for programs under his or her jurisdiction, in consultation with the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Attorney General, and the Secretary of the Youth and Correctional Agency.

(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall grant
 waivers or negotiated contracts for programs under his or her jurisdiction, in consultation with the Attorney General, the Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency, and the Secretary of the Youth and Adult Correctional Agency.

(c) The Attorney General shall grant waivers or negotiate contracts for programs under his or her jurisdiction in consultation with the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency, and the Secretary of the Youth and Adult Correctional Agency.

(d) The Secretary of the Youth and Adult Correctional Agency shall grant waivers or negotiate contracts for programs under his or her jurisdiction in consultation with the Attorney General, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and the Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency.

(e) The entity to whom a
 request for a waiver or negotiated contract is submitted pursuant to this section shall issue written notice of the granting of the waiver, any delay in the consideration of the waiver request, or denial of the requested waiver within 60 days of the receipt of the request. Any county may appeal a negative decision regarding a requested waiver or negotiated contract.

(f) In addition to approval required by subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, all requests for negotiated contracts shall be approved by the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 347, Sec. 50.   (SB 942)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18986.24.

The Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Attorney General, or the Secretary of the Youth and Adult Correctional Agency shall notify the appropriate policy committees and fiscal committees of the Legislature no later than 30 days before any waiver or negotiated contract granted pursuant to this article take effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 347, Sec. 51.   (SB 942)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Evaluation [18986.30. - 18986.30.]

18986.30.

Two years after the approval of an initial waiver or negotiated contract request pursuant to Sections 18986.20 to 18986.24, inclusive, the department shall review and report to the Legislative Analyst on the progress of the councils for which fiscal incentives and necessary waivers or negotiated contracts to establish the council’s programs have been approved and granted. Programs to coordinate comprehensive children’s services shall be deemed successful based upon the following:

(a) The county’s ability to meet specific success criteria as specified in its overall plan.

(b) The county’s ability to demonstrate cost avoidance which equals or exceeds the cost of the plan. This cost avoidance shall include the following categories, where appropriate:

(1) Group home costs paid by Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care (AFDC-FC). 

(2) Children and adolescent state hospital programs. 

(3) Juvenile justice recidivism or reincarceration.

(4) Nonpublic school residential placement costs. 

(5) Other short-term and long-term savings in public funds resulting from the plans.

(c) The Legislative Analyst shall submit a review of the report to the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1296, Sec. 24.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.82. Integrated Children’s Services Programs [18986.40. - 18986.46.]

18986.40.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter, “program” or “integrated children’s services programs” means a coordinated children’s service system, operating as a program that is part of a department or State Department of Health Care Services initiative, that offers a full range of integrated behavioral, social, health, and mental health services, including applicable educational services, to special needs
 children with serious emotional disturbance, or programs established by county governments, local education agencies, or consortia of public and private agencies, to jointly provide two or more of the following services to children or their families, or both:

(1) Educational services for children at risk of dropping out, or who need additional educational services to be successful academically.

(2) Health care.

(3) All mental health diagnostic and treatment services, including medication.

(4) Substance use, misuse, or disorder
 prevention and treatment.

(5) Child abuse prevention, identification, and treatment.

(6) Nutrition services.

(7) Childcare and development services.

(8) Juvenile justice services.

(9) Child welfare services.

(10) Early intervention and prevention services.

(11) Crisis intervention services, as defined in subdivision (c).

(12) Any other service that will enhance the health, development, and well-being of children and their families.

(b) For the purposes of this chapter, “children’s multidisciplinary services team” means a team of two or more persons trained and qualified to provide one or more of the services listed in subdivision (a), who are responsible in the program for identifying the educational, health, or social service needs of a child and
 their family, and for developing a plan to address those needs. A family member, or the designee of a family member, shall be invited to participate in team meetings and decisions, unless the team determines that, in its professional judgment, this participation would present a reasonable risk of a significant adverse or detrimental effect on the minor’s psychological or physical safety. Members of the team shall be trained in the confidentiality and information sharing provisions of this chapter.

(c) “Crisis intervention services” means early support and psychological assistance, to be continued as necessary, to a child who was the victim of, or whose
 life has have been affected by, a violent crime or a cataclysmic incident, such as a natural disaster, or who have been involved in a school, neighborhood, or family-based critical incident likely to cause profound psychological effects if not addressed immediately and thoroughly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 62.5.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18986.46.

(a) A program shall utilize children’s multidisciplinary services teams, as defined in this chapter.

(b) A team member shall provide program services only as employed by, under contract with, or otherwise affiliated with, the program, and shall not share information, or provide program services, when acting as a separate local, state, or private agency or entity.

(c) A program shall be considered a single program for purposes of federal substance abuse program regulations contained in Part 2 (commencing with Section 2.1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(d) Notwithstanding any
 other provision of law regarding disclosure of information and records, a program shall be permitted to establish a unified services record for a child and family. That record shall contain all records of prior services that are released to the program and that are relevant and necessary to formulate an integrated services plan, pursuant to valid written authorizations, as well as a record of all service provided under the program.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law regarding disclosure of information and records, when a child enters the program a parent, guardian, judicial office with jurisdiction over the minor, or a minor with legal power to consent, or nonminor dependent, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, shall be asked to sign a single authorization that gives a knowing and informed consent, in writing, and that complies with all other applicable provisions of state law governing release of medical, mental
 health, social service, and educational records, and that covers multiple service providers, in order to permit the release of records to the program. This single authorization shall not include adoption records. The authorized representative of the child, or the child in a case where he or she has the legal right to consent, or the nonminor dependent, shall be fully apprised of the requirements of this subdivision prior to participation in the program. Before information may be exchanged about a particular child or family pursuant to this chapter, a representative of the program shall do all of the following:

(1) Explain to the authorized representative of the child, or the child in a case where he or she has the legal right to consent, or the nonminor dependent, both of the following, and this explanation shall be given before any information about the child or family is recorded and before any services are provided:

(A) Information provided by the child or family, or nonminor dependent, may only be exchanged within the program with the express written consent of the authorized representative.

(B) Information shall not be disclosed to anyone other than members of the children’s multidisciplinary services team, and those qualified to receive information as explained in subdivision (i).

(2) The authorized representative of the child, or the child in a case where he or she has the legal right to consent, or the nonminor dependent, shall be informed that he or she has a right to refuse to sign, or to limit the scope of, the consent form, and that a refusal to sign, or to limit the scope of, the consent form will not have an adverse impact on the client’s eligibility for services under the programs described in this chapter.

(f) The knowing and informed consent given pursuant to this chapter shall only be in force for the time that the child or family, or nonminor dependent, is a client of the program.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of state law governing the disclosure of information and records, persons who are trained, qualified, and assigned by their respective agencies to serve on teams within a program and other team members included pursuant to this chapter may view relevant sections of unified program records and may disclose to one another relevant information and view records on a child or the child’s family as necessary to formulate an integrated services plan or to deliver services to children and their families.

(2) This information and records may include information relevant to the evaluation of
 the child and his or her family, the development of a treatment plan for the child and his or her family, and the delivery of services. Relevant information and records shall be shared with family members or family designees on the team, except information or records, if any, disclosure of which the team determines would present a reasonable risk of a significant adverse or detrimental effect on the minor’s psychological or physical safety.

(h) (1) If the members of a children’s multidisciplinary services team within an integrated children’s services program require records held by other team members, copies may be provided to them.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law regarding disclosure of information and records, a program may establish and maintain a common data base for the purpose of delivering services under the program. The database may
 contain demographic data and may identify the services recommended for, and provided to, a child and his or her family by the program. The database shall be for use and disclosure only within the program, except by properly authorized consent by a parent, guardian, judicial officer with jurisdiction over the child, or a minor with the legal power to consent.

(3) The program may authorize use of information contained in the database for bona fide evaluation and research purposes, unless otherwise prohibited by law. No information disclosed under this paragraph shall permit identification of the individual patient or client. The release of copies of mental health records, physical health records, and drug or alcohol records in programs establishing a unified services record shall be governed by the single authorization of informed and knowing consent to release these records. In programs not establishing a unified services record and not
 utilizing the single authorization of informed and knowing consent, release of these records may take place only after the team has received a form permitting release of records on the child or the child’s family, signed by the child, to the extent the records were generated as a result of health care services to which the child has the power to consent under state law, or, to the extent that the records have not been generated by the provision of these health care services, by the child’s parent, guardian, or legal representative, including the court which has jurisdiction over those children who are wards or dependents of the court.

(i) The children’s multidisciplinary services team may designate persons qualified pursuant to Section 18986.40 to be a member of the team for a particular case. A person designated as a team member pursuant to this subdivision may receive and disclose relevant information and records, subject to the
 confidentiality provisions of subdivision (k).

(j) The sharing of information permitted under subdivision (g) shall be governed by memoranda of understanding among the participating service providers or agencies in the coordinated children’s service system or program. These memoranda shall specify the types of information that may be shared without a signed release form, in accordance with subdivision (e), and the process to be used to ensure that current confidentiality requirements, as described in subdivision (k), are met. This paragraph shall not be construed to waive any right of privilege contained in the Evidence Code, except in compliance with Section 912 of that code.

(k) Every member of the children’s multidisciplinary services team who receives information or records on children and families served in the integrated children’s services program shall be under the same
 privacy and confidentiality obligations and subject to the same confidentiality penalties as the person disclosing or providing the information or records. The information or records obtained shall be maintained in a manner that ensures the maximum protection of privacy and confidentiality rights.

(l) This section shall not be construed to restrict guarantees of confidentiality provided under federal law.

(m) Information and records communicated or provided to the program, by all providers, programs, and agencies, as well as information and records created by the program in the course of serving its children and their families, shall be deemed private and confidential and shall be protected from discovery and disclosure by all applicable statutory and common law protections. Civil and criminal penalties shall apply to the inappropriate disclosure of information held by the
 program. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the authority of a health care provider to disclose medical information pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 56.10 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 846, Sec. 64.   (AB 1712)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.84. Interagency Day Care Program [18986.50. - 18986.53.]

18986.50.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this chapter, to encourage the development of programs and services, in keeping with Chapter 12.8 (commencing with Section 18986) and Chapter 12.82 (commencing with Section 18986.40), that enhance the successful development of children and reduce the incidence of juvenile crime and delinquency in the community.

(2) The San Bernardino County Youth Justice Center shall provide all available evaluative and operational studies related to its program to any county that requests that information in order to replicate the model or implement a similar program.

(b) This chapter is intended
 to augment existing interagency collaborative efforts by proposing an additional model.

(c) This chapter is not intended to supersede or duplicate existing programs, services, or interagency agreements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 294.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

18986.53.

(a) Any county may implement an interagency day care program for multiple needs youths who are either being served by, or are at risk of being served by, the juvenile justice system pursuant to Article 14 (commencing with Section 600) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2. This program shall be based on the San Bernardino County Youth Justice Center model.

(b) The program shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A day treatment center, for the provision of support services for juveniles referred by any of the interagency coordination council members, without the removal of the juvenile from his or her home.

(2) Case management services, coordinating the provision of support services by the participating agencies, including county agencies that provide probation services, health services, mental health services, social services, and educational services.

(3) Family support and preservation services, including support services for the parents and siblings of the juvenile and for the juvenile.

(4) A goal of positive community readjustment and personal responsibility for the juveniles and their families.

(5) A process for conflict resolution among agencies.

(6) An evaluation component, to track the outcome of treatment under this section and to evaluate effectiveness and cost effectiveness of the program in savings in the costs of incarceration of the juveniles, the costs of out-of-home placement, and other measures determined by the evaluator to be useful in the evaluation of the effectiveness of the program.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any county may consolidate the functions of the coordinating body implementing the coordination of services for purposes of this chapter into a single body that also includes all of the following:

(1) The interagency placement committee meeting the requirements of Section 4096.

(2) The interagency case management council established in compliance with Section 5866.

(3) The children’s multidisciplinary services team defined in subdivision (b) of Section 18986.40.

(d) If a county develops, or is in the process of developing, an evaluation component to identify outcome, cost, and other measures to determine the effectiveness of the program and its cost-effectiveness in providing interagency services for children and adolescents, the evaluation requirements of this chapter shall be integrated with existing evaluation capabilities.

(e) The local agency or the department shall seek private funding for the program, particularly money to be used to augment the operation of the program and the support of the affected youth service agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 970, Sec. 2.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.86. Children’s Services Program Development [18987.6. - 18987.62.]

18987.6.

It is the intent of the Legislature to do all of the following:

(a) Permit all counties to provide children with service alternatives to group home care through the development of expanded family-based services programs and to expand the capacity of group homes to provide services appropriate to the changing needs of children in their care.

(b) Encourage collaboration among persons and entities including, but not limited to, parents, county welfare departments, county mental health departments, county probation departments, county health departments, special education local planning agencies, school districts, and private service providers for the purpose of planning and providing individualized services for children and their birth or substitute families.

(c) Ensure local community participation in the development of innovative delivery of services by county placing agencies and service providers and the use of the service resources and expertise of nonprofit providers to develop family-based and community-based service alternatives.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 311, Sec. 71.   Effective August 19, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18987.61.

(a) Each county may enter into performance agreements with private nonprofit agencies to encourage innovation in the delivery of children’s services, to develop services not available in the community, and to promote change in the child welfare services system.

(b) In developing the agreements, counties and service providers shall pursue services that enhance the ability of children to remain in the least restrictive, most family-like setting possible and promote services that address the needs and strengths of individual children and their families.

(c) Programs developed pursuant to this section shall operate within the county, or in another county with the approval of that county.

(d) If the director issues a waiver pursuant to Section 18987.62, the agreements pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be for a period of up to three years, but may be renewed or extended consistent with any extension of the waiver granted by the State Department of Social Services
 pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 18987.62.

(e) For waivers entered into before January 1, 2010, a county shall provide a report to the director due six months prior to the end of the original agreement period to report on the details of the agreement, the results achieved during its operation, and the applicability of the approach to a wider population. The director shall make these reports available to the Legislature upon request.

(f) Commencing January 1, 2010, in order to comply with the reporting requirement set forth in subdivision (e), the county or private nonprofit agency shall fund an independent evaluation of the waiver, with a report of the results due to the department six months prior to the end of the waiver period of three years. The evaluation and report shall include, but need not be limited to, the details of the agreement, the results achieved during its operation, and the applicability of the approach to a wider population. The department, the county, and the private nonprofit agency shall agree with the design and parameters of the independent evaluation prior to the approval of the waiver.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 445, Sec. 1.   (AB 488)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

18987.62.

(a) Upon request from a county, the director may waive regulations governing foster care payments or the operation of group homes to enable counties to implement the agreements established pursuant to Section 18987.61. Waivers granted by the director shall be applicable only to services provided under the terms of the agreement and for the duration of the agreement, whichever is earlier, unless the director authorizes an extension of the waiver pursuant to subdivision (f). A waiver shall only be granted when all of the following apply:

(1) The agreement promises to offer a worthwhile test of an innovative approach or to encourage the development of a new service for which there
 is a recognized need.

(2) The regulatory requirement prevents the implementation of the agreement.

(3) The requesting county proposes to monitor the agreement through performance measures that ensure that the purposes of the waived regulation will be achieved.

(b) The director shall take steps that are necessary to prevent the loss of any substantial amounts of federal funds as a result of the waivers granted under this section. The waiver may specify the extent to which the requesting county shall share in any cost resulting from any loss of federal funding.

(c) The director shall not waive regulations that apply to the health and safety of children served
 by participating private nonprofit agencies.

(d) The director shall notify the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature whenever waivers are granted and when a waiver of regulations was required for the implementation of the county’s proposed agreement. The director shall identify the reason why the development of the services outlined by the agreement between the county and the service provider are hindered by the regulations to be waived.

(e) The county or private nonprofit agency shall fund an independent evaluation of the waiver as described in subdivision (f) of Section 18987.61.

(f) The director may grant a county’s request to extend the
 waiver, in increments of three years, based upon a review and analysis of all of the following information:

(1) The results of the report, if required under subdivision (e) of Section 18987.61.

(2) The results of the independent evaluation of the waiver pursuant to subdivision (e) of this section.

(3) Justification for the extension, and verification of continued compliance with this section.

(g) (1) For any waiver approved on or before January 1, 2010, an extension of the waiver for up to an additional three years may be based upon the department’s review and analysis of the information required to be submitted in subdivision
 (f).
